Utah statutes.
4-22-4.   Commission powers, duties, and functions.
The commission has and shall exercise the following functions, powers, and
duties:
(1)  to employ and fix the salary of a full-time administrator, not a member
of the commission, to administer the policies adopted, and perform the duties
assigned, by the commission;
(2)  to conduct a campaign of research, nutritional education, and publicity,
showing the value of milk, cream, and dairy products;
(3)  to encourage local, national, and international use of Utah dairy
products and by-products, through advertising or otherwise;
(4)  to investigate and participate in studies of problems peculiar to
producers in Utah and to take all actions consistent with this chapter to
promote, protect, and stabilize the state dairy industry;
(5)  to sue and be sued, prosecute actions in the name of the state for the
collection of the assessment imposed by Section 4-22-7, enter into contracts,
and incur indebtedness in furtherance of its business activities;
(6)  to cooperate with any local, state, or national organization engaged in
activities similar to those of the commission;
(7)  to accept grants, donations, or gifts for use consistent with this
chapter; and
(8)  to do all other things necessary for the efficient and effective
management and operation of its business.
